Wyoming, session 2025, HB0302.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-104 by creating a new subsection
(e) and 21-3-132 by creating a new subsection (k) are
amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

HB0302

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0789
(e) A governmental entity shall be immune from
liability for any tort associated with any claim arising
solely from or related to a public employee's use, or
failure to use, a firearm. For purposes of this subsection,
a public employee who is acting within the scope of his
duty when using or failing to use a firearm shall be
entitled to a defense at the governmental entity's expense
in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

21-3-132. Possession of firearms on school property.

(k) Pursuant to W.S. 1-39-104, a school district
shall be immune from liability for any tort associated with
any claim arising solely from or related to a school
district employee's use, or failure to use, a firearm that
is carried in accordance with this section.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0302